Florida, session 2026, SB1562.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSubsection (16) and paragraph (a) of subsection 24 (36) of section 320.64, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 25 subsection (44) is added to that section, to read: 26 320.64âDenial, suspension, or revocation of license; 27 grounds.âA license of a licensee under s. 320.61 may be denied, 28 suspended, or revoked within the entire state or at any specific 29 location or locations within the state at which the applicant or 30 licensee engages or proposes to engage in business, upon proof 31 that the section was violated with sufficient frequency to 32 establish a pattern of wrongdoing, and a licensee or applicant 33 shall be liable for claims and remedies provided in ss. 320.695 34 and 320.697 for any violation of any of the following 35 provisions. A licensee is prohibited from committing the 36 following acts: 37 (16)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 38 agreement, the applicant or licensee prevents or refuses to 39 accept the succession to any interest in a franchise agreement 40 by any legal heir or devisee under the will of a motor vehicle 41 dealer or under the laws of descent and distribution of this 42 state; provided, the applicant or licensee is not required to 43 accept a succession: 44 1.âWhen where such heir or devisee does not meet licenseeâs 45 written, reasonable, and uniformly applied minimal standard 46 qualifications for dealer applicants; 47 2.âor Which, after notice and administrative hearing 48 pursuant to chapter 120, is demonstrated to be detrimental to 49 the public interest or to the representation of the applicant or 50 licensee; or 51 3.âWhen the direct result of such succession will cause the 52 applicant or licensee to be in violation of subsection (44). 53 (b)âThis subsection does not Nothing contained herein, 54 however, shall prevent a motor vehicle dealer, during his or her 55 lifetime, from designating any person as his or her successor in 56 interest by written instrument filed with and accepted by the 57 applicant or licensee. A licensee who rejects the successor 58 transferee under this subsection shall have the burden of 59 establishing in any proceeding where such rejection is in issue 60 that the rejection of the successor transferee complies with 61 this subsection. 62 (36)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 63 agreement, in addition to any other statutory or contractual 64 rights of recovery after the voluntary or involuntary 65 termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, failing 66 to pay the motor vehicle dealer, as provided in paragraph (d), 67 the following amounts: 68 1.âThe net cost paid by the dealer for each new motor 69 vehicle other than motorcycles car or truck in the dealerâs 70 inventory with mileage of 2,000 miles or less, or each new a 71 motorcycle in the dealerâs inventory with mileage of 100 miles 72 or less, exclusive of mileage placed on the motor vehicle before 73 it was delivered to the dealer. 74 2.âThe current price charged for each new, unused, 75 undamaged, or unsold part or accessory that: 76 a.âIs in the current parts catalog and is still in the 77 original, resalable merchandising package and in an unbroken 78 lot, except that sheet metal may be in a comparable substitute 79 for the original package; and 80 b.âWas purchased by the dealer directly from the 81 manufacturer or distributor or from an outgoing authorized 82 dealer as a part of the dealerâs initial inventory. 83 3.âThe fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by 84 the dealer which bears a trademark or trade name used or claimed 85 by the applicant or licensee or its representative which was 86 purchased from or at the request of the applicant or licensee or 87 its representative. 88 4.âThe fair market value of all special tools, data 89 processing equipment, and automotive service equipment owned by 90 the dealer which: 91 a.âWere recommended in writing by the applicant or licensee 92 or its representative and designated as special tools and 93 equipment; 94 b.âWere purchased from or at the request of the applicant 95 or licensee or its representative; and 96 c.âAre in usable and good condition except for reasonable 97 wear and tear. 98 5.âThe cost of transporting, handling, packing, storing, 99 and loading any property subject to repurchase under this 100 section. 101 (44)(a)âThe applicant or licensee has directly or 102 indirectly distributed 1,000 or more motor vehicles of a 103 particular line-make to motor vehicle dealers in this state 104 during any 12-month period and has directly or indirectly 105 distributed more than 33.33 percent of those same line-make 106 motor vehicles during that 12-month period to one motor vehicle 107 dealer or to multiple motor vehicle dealers that share common 108 ownership or control. For purposes of this subsection, a motor 109 vehicle dealer shares common ownership or control with another 110 motor vehicle dealer if: 111 1.âIt is directly or indirectly controlled by or has more 112 than 30 percent of its equity interest directly or indirectly 113 owned by another motor vehicle dealer; or 114 2.âIt has more than 30 percent of its equity interest 115 directly or indirectly controlled or owned by one or more 116 persons who also directly or indirectly control or own more than 117 30 percent of the equity interests of another motor vehicle 118 dealer. 119 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to any line-make of 120 motor vehicle for which there exists a licensed franchised 121 dealer in this state as of January 1, 2026, or to an applicant 122 or licensee who is not prohibited by s. 320.645 from owning or 123 operating a motor vehicle dealership. 124 125 A motor vehicle dealer who can demonstrate that a violation of, 126 or failure to comply with, any of the preceding provisions by an 127 applicant or licensee will or may adversely and pecuniarily 128 affect the complaining dealer, shall be entitled to pursue all 129 of the remedies, procedures, and rights of recovery available 130 under ss. 320.695 and 320.697. 131 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 320.643, 132 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 133 320.643âTransfer, assignment, or sale of franchise 134 agreements.â 135 (1)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 136 agreement, a licensee may shall not, by contract or otherwise, 137 fail or refuse to give effect to, prevent, prohibit, or penalize 138 or attempt to refuse to give effect to, prohibit, or penalize 139 any motor vehicle dealer from selling, assigning, transferring, 140 alienating, or otherwise disposing of its franchise agreement to 141 any other person or persons, including a corporation established 142 or existing for the purpose of owning or holding a franchise 143 agreement, unless the licensee proves at a hearing pursuant to a 144 complaint filed by a motor vehicle dealer under this section 145 that the sale, transfer, alienation, or other disposition: 146 1.âIs to a person who is not, or whose controlling 147 executive management is not, of good moral character; 148 2.âIs to a person who or does not meet the written, 149 reasonable, and uniformly applied standards or qualifications of 150 the licensee relating to financial qualifications of the 151 transferee and business experience of the transferee or the 152 transfereeâs executive management; or 153 3.âWould directly cause the licensee to be in violation of 154 s. 320.64(44). 155 (b)âA motor vehicle dealer who desires to sell, assign, 156 transfer, alienate, or otherwise dispose of a franchise shall 157 notify, or cause the proposed transferee to notify, the 158 licensee, in writing, setting forth the prospective transfereeâs 159 name, address, financial qualifications, and business experience 160 during the previous 5 years. A licensee who receives such notice 161 may, within 60 days following such receipt, notify the motor 162 vehicle dealer, in writing, that the proposed transferee is not 163 a person qualified to be a transferee under this section and 164 setting forth the material reasons for such rejection. Failure 165 of the licensee to notify the motor vehicle dealer within the 166 60-day period of such rejection shall be deemed an approval of 167 the transfer. No such transfer, assignment, or sale shall be 168 valid unless the transferee agrees in writing to comply with all 169 requirements of the franchise then in effect, but with the 170 ownership changed to the transferee. 171 (c)(b)âA motor vehicle dealer whose proposed sale is 172 rejected may, within 60 days following such receipt of such 173 rejection, file with the department a complaint for a 174 determination that the proposed transferee has been rejected in 175 violation of this section. The licensee has the burden of proof 176 with respect to all issues raised by the complaint. The 177 department shall determine, and enter an order providing, that 178 the proposed transferee is either qualified or is not and cannot 179 be qualified for specified reasons, or the order may provide the 180 conditions under which a proposed transferee would be qualified. 181 If the licensee fails to file such a response to the motor 182 vehicle dealerâs complaint within 30 days after receipt of the 183 complaint, unless the parties agree in writing to an extension, 184 or if the department, after a hearing, renders a decision other 185 than one disqualifying the proposed transferee, the franchise 186 agreement between the motor vehicle dealer and the licensee is 187 deemed amended to incorporate such transfer or amended in 188 accordance with the determination and order rendered, effective 189 upon compliance by the proposed transferee with any conditions 190 set forth in the determination or order. 191 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 192 agreement, a licensee may shall not, by contract or otherwise, 193 fail or refuse to give effect to, prevent, prohibit, or 194 penalize, or attempt to refuse to give effect to, prevent, 195 prohibit, or penalize, any motor vehicle dealer or any 196 proprietor, partner, stockholder, owner, or other person who 197 holds or otherwise owns an interest therein from selling, 198 assigning, transferring, alienating, or otherwise disposing of, 199 in whole or in part, the equity interest of any of them in such 200 motor vehicle dealer to any other person or persons, including a 201 corporation established or existing for the purpose of owning or 202 holding the stock or ownership interests of other entities, 203 unless the licensee proves at a hearing pursuant to a complaint 204 filed by a motor vehicle dealer under this section that the 205 sale, transfer, alienation, or other disposition: 206 1.âIs to a person who is not, or whose controlling 207 executive management is not, of good moral character; or 208 2.âWould directly cause the licensee to be in violation of 209 s. 320.64(44). 210 (b)âA motor vehicle dealer, or any proprietor, partner, 211 stockholder, owner, or other person who holds or otherwise owns 212 an interest in the motor vehicle dealer, who desires to sell, 213 assign, transfer, alienate, or otherwise dispose of any interest 214 in such motor vehicle dealer shall notify, or cause the proposed 215 transferee to so notify, the licensee, in writing, of the 216 identity and address of the proposed transferee. A licensee who 217 receives such notice may, within 60 days following such receipt, 218 notify the motor vehicle dealer in writing that the proposed 219 transferee is not a person qualified to be a transferee under 220 this section and setting forth the material reasons for such 221 rejection. Failure of the licensee to notify the motor vehicle 222 dealer within the 60-day period of such rejection shall be 223 deemed an approval of the transfer. Any person whose proposed 224 sale of stock is rejected may file within 60 days of receipt of 225 such rejection a complaint with the department alleging that the 226 rejection was in violation of the law or the franchise 227 agreement. The licensee has the burden of proof with respect to 228 all issues raised by such complaint. The department shall 229 determine, and enter an order providing, that the proposed 230 transferee either is qualified or is not and cannot be qualified 231 for specified reasons; or the order may provide the conditions 232 under which a proposed transferee would be qualified. If the 233 licensee fails to file a response to the motor vehicle dealerâs 234 complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint, unless the 235 parties agree in writing to an extension, or if the department, 236 after a hearing, renders a decision on the complaint other than 237 one disqualifying the proposed transferee, the transfer shall be 238 deemed approved in accordance with the determination and order 239 rendered, effective upon compliance by the proposed transferee 240 with any conditions set forth in the determination or order. 241 (c)(b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), a licensee may not 242 reject a proposed transfer of a legal, equitable, or beneficial 243 interest in a motor vehicle dealer to a trust or other entity, 244 or to any beneficiary thereof, which is established by an owner 245 of any interest in a motor vehicle dealer for purposes of estate 246 planning, if the controlling person of the trust or entity, or 247 the beneficiary, is of good moral character. 248 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.